Massachusetts, session 194th, S3182.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the city of 
Taunton, acting by and through its conservation commission, municipal council, and mayor, may 
take the necessary actions to transfer the following certain parcels of land held for conservation 
purposes and under the care, custody and control of the conservation commission to the care, 
custody and control of the mayor and municipal council for improvements to the public way 
known as Scadding Street: Parcel No. E-5, containing approximately 6,891 square feet; and 
Parcel No. D-2, containing approximately 586 square feet, all as shown on that certain set of 
road improvement plans entitled “Plan of Land in the City of Taunton Bristol County Showing 
Location of Permanent and Temporary Easements Taken by the City of Taunton” prepared by 
Nitsch Engineering, dated March 25, 2024, as planned under Massachusetts department of 
transportation Project No. 608616. Prior to completing said transfer, the city of Taunton and the 

of 3 12 Massachusetts department of transportation may make minor modifications to the plans to carry 
out the purposes of this Act. 
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the city of 
Taunton, acting by and through its conservation commission, municipal council, and mayor, may 
take the necessary actions to transfer the following certain parcels of land held for conservation 
purposes and under the care, custody and control of the conservation commission to the care, 
custody and control of the mayor and municipal council for improvements to the public way 
known as Rhode Island Road (also known as state highway route 79): Parcel T-X-1, containing 
approximately 42 square feet; and Parcel T-D-2, containing approximately 2,297 square feet, all 
as shown on that certain set of road improvement plans entitled “Massachusetts Department of 
Transportation Highway Division Plan and Profile of Route 79 (Myricks St/Rhode Island Rd) in 
the Town/City of Lakeville and Taunton Plymouth County and Bristol County Preliminary Right 
of Way Plans”, prepared by BETA Group, Inc., dated November 4, 2024, as planned under 
Massachusetts department of transportation Project No. 606715. Prior to completing said 
transfer, the city of Taunton and the Massachusetts department of transportation may make 
minor modifications to the plans to carry out the purposes of this Act. 
SECTION 3. In consideration of the transfers of land pursuant to sections 1 and 2, the 
city of Taunton and to ensure no net loss of land subject to Article XCVII of the amendments to 
the constitution of the commonwealth, acting by and through its mayor and municipal council, 
shall transfer the parcel of city-owned land located on Fisher Street, shown on city of Taunton 
assessor maps as Parcel 64-295, said parcel being more particularly shown and described as 
Parcel 12 on a certain plan of land entitled “Plan of Land Taunton, Mass. Owned by: 
Quequechan Development Corporation” dated May 2, 1972, Scale 1”=40’, recorded with the 

of 3 35 Bristol County Northern District Registry of Deeds in Book 131, Page 26, owned by the City of 
Taunton under Final Decree in Tax Lien Case dated February 18, 1984, recorded with said 
Registry in Book 2448, Page 81, said parcel containing approximately 23,858 square feet of land 
and presently held for general municipal purposes, to the care, custody and control of the 
conservation commission for the city of Taunton for conservation purposes. In the event that an 
independent appraisal of the fair market value or value in use, whichever is greater, determines 
that the monetary value of said parcel is not equal or greater than the fair market value or value 
in use, whichever is greater, of the land described in Section 1 and Section 2 of this act, then the 
difference in monetary value shall be deposited into a segregated account solely for the purposes 
of acquiring land for conservation purposes. Said parcel conveyed to the conservation 
commission of the city of Taunton pursuant to this section shall be subject to Article XCVII of 
the Amendments to the Constitution of the Commonwealth. 
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.